Washington statutes.
RCW 4.18.040

Application of limitation period of other state—Unfairness.

If the court determines that the limitation period of another state applicable under RCW 4.18.020 and 4.18.030 is substantially different from the limitation period of this state and has not afforded a fair opportunity to sue upon, or imposes an unfair burden in defending against, the claim, the limitation period of this state applies.

[ 1983 c 152 s 4.]